California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(1) The requested information is relevant and material to an investigation pursuant to Sections 3130, 3131, 3132, 3133, and 3134 of the Family Code concerning the kidnapping, abduction, concealment, detention, or retention of a minor child and that the inspector or investigator requesting the information has a reasonable, good faith belief that the utility customer information is needed to assist the inspector or investigator in the location or recovery of a minor child or abductor, coconspirator or aider and abettor of the continuing crime of child abduction or concealment.

(2) Only inspectors and investigators as defined in Section 830.1 of the Penal Code, who are employed in the office of a district attorney whose names have been submitted to the utility in writing by a district attorney’s office, may request and receive customer and customer service information pursuant to this section. Each district attorney’s office shall ensure that each public utility has at all times a current list of the names of inspectors and investigators authorized to request and receive customer and customer service information. Each district attorney’s office shall immediately notify the utility in writing and withdraw the names of inspectors and investigators from the authorized list who no longer have a need for the access.

(3) This section does not authorize inspectors and investigators to obtain any utility customer information, other than that authorized by this section, without proper service of process as required by law.

(4) The district attorney’s office requesting and receiving utility information shall ensure its confidentiality. At no time shall any information obtained pursuant to this section be disclosed or used for any purpose other than to assist in the location or recovery of a person or persons specified in paragraph (1).

(5) The inspector or investigator requesting utility information authorized for release by this section shall make a record on a form created and maintained by the district attorney’s office, which shall include the name of the utility customer about whom the inquiry was made, the name of the inspector or investigator making the inquiry, the date of inquiry, the name of the utility, the utility employee to whom the request was made, and the information that was requested and received.

(6) The inspector or investigator requesting information pursuant to this section shall prepare and sign, under penalty of perjury, a written affidavit of probable cause, which shall be contained on a form created by the Attorney General’s office in consultation with telephone, gas, and electric utilities. The form shall be retained by the utility for a period of one year and shall contain a statement of all the facts known to the inspector or investigator that support the existence of all of the requirements of this section. The affidavit shall also contain a statement of exigent circumstances, explaining why the inspector or investigator could not seek and obtain a search warrant, court order, or other court process for the production of the information sought.

(c) No public utility, or official or employee thereof, shall be subject to criminal or civil liability for the release of customer information in reasonable reliance on an affidavit appearing on its face to be valid, and which was submitted by a person whose name appears on the current authorization list, as required in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). However, any person who willfully violates any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, pursuant to Section 2112.5.

(d) The utility receiving the request for customer information may charge the requesting district attorney’s office a reasonable fee for the search and release of the requested information and for the storage of the required forms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 112, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

589.

(a) In an existing or new proceeding, the commission shall require the electrical and gas corporations to cooperate in establishing a single Internet Web site available to the public that provides up-to-date information, updated no less frequently than once every 30 days, regarding ratepayer-funded energy efficiency assistance programs that, to the extent the information is available, in an aggregate format that would not provide identifying information about individual customers of the electrical and gas corporations, include all of the following:

(1) The types of energy efficiency measures installed.

(2) The ZIP Code location of each customer receiving
 ratepayer-funded energy efficiency assistance.

(3) The amount of funds expended at each ZIP Code location.

(4) The expected annual energy savings and reduced energy usage expected in kilowatthours or therms.

(b) (1) The commission shall order the electrical and gas corporations to establish, based on data, ratepayer-funded energy efficiency assistance program reports on program totals, geographical and monthly statistics, cost distribution, and progress toward program goals.

(2) The electrical and gas corporations shall make the reports available on the Internet Web site established pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The commission shall require the electrical and gas
 corporations to publish data, including the amount expended, on the ratepayer-funded energy efficiency programs that are not direct retrofits, including, but not limited to, research on building and appliance standards and marketing and outreach, on the Internet Web site established pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) The commission shall take steps necessary to ensure the Internet Web site established pursuant to subdivision (a) is available to the public on or before June 1, 2014.

(e) The commission shall have a link to the Internet Web site established pursuant to subdivision (a) on the commission’s Internet Web site and require the electrical and gas corporations to have a link to the Internet Web site established pursuant to subdivision (a) on the appropriate page of the Internet Web site of each electrical and gas corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 147.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

590.

The commission shall require each electrical corporation to report annually on its compliance with the standards or rules adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 364. That report shall be made available to the public, except that the commission may, consistent with other provisions of law, withhold from the public information generated or obtained pursuant to this section that it deems would pose a security threat to the public if disclosed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 16.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

591.

(a) The commission shall require an electrical or gas corporation to annually notify the commission, as part of an ongoing proceeding or in a report otherwise required to be submitted to the commission, of each time since that notification was last provided that capital or expense revenue authorized by the commission for maintenance, safety, or reliability was redirected by the electrical or gas corporation to other purposes.

(b) The commission shall ensure that the notification provided by each electrical or gas corporation is also made available in a timely fashion to the Office of the Safety Advocate, Public Advocate’s Office of the Public Utilities Commission, and parties on the service list of any relevant proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 42.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Relocation Assistance [600. - 600.]

600.

A public utility acquiring real property by eminent domain shall provide relocation advisory assistance and shall make any of the payments required of public entities by Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 7260) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1574.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Eminent Domain [610. - 626.]

610.

This article applies only to a corporation or person that is a public utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

611.

A railroad corporation may condemn any property necessary for the construction and maintenance of its railroad.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

612.

An electrical corporation may condemn any property necessary for the construction and maintenance of its electric plant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

613.

A gas corporation may condemn any property necessary for the construction and maintenance of its gas plant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

614.

A heat corporation may condemn any property necessary for the construction and maintenance of its heating plant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

615.

A pipeline corporation may condemn any property necessary for the construction and maintenance of its pipeline.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

616.

A telephone corporation may condemn any property necessary for the construction and maintenance of its telephone line.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

616.1.

Notwithstanding Section 616, a telephone corporation may not condemn any property on an airport owned by a city and county, and located in another county, unless that property is necessary for that telephone corporation to provide telecommunications as a carrier of last resort seeking to serve an unserved area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 774, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

617.

A telegraph corporation may condemn any property necessary for the construction and maintenance of its telegraph line.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

618.

A water corporation may condemn any property necessary for the construction and maintenance of its water system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

619.

A wharfinger may condemn any property necessary for the construction and maintenance of facilities for the receipt or discharge of freight or passengers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

620.

A common carrier, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 211, may condemn any property necessary for the construction and maintenance of facilities for its transportation of persons or property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

621.

A street railroad corporation may condemn any property necessary for the construction and maintenance of its street railroad.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

622.

(a) As used in this section, “motor carrier” means:

A passenger stage corporation as defined in Section 226.

(b) As used in this section, “water carrier” means a common carrier operating upon any waterway in this state between fixed termini or over a regular route.

(c) A motor carrier or water carrier may condemn any property necessary for the construction and maintenance of terminal facilities for the receipt, transfer, or delivery of the passengers or property it carries or for other terminal facilities of any such carrier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1042, Sec. 16.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

623.

A warehouseman may condemn any property necessary for the construction and maintenance of its facilities for storing property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

624.

A sewer system corporation may condemn any property necessary for the construction and maintenance of its sewer system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

625.

(a) (1) (A) For the purpose of this article, except as specified in paragraph (4), a public utility that offers competitive services may not condemn any property for the purpose of competing with another entity in the offering of those competitive services, unless the commission finds that such an action would serve the public interest, pursuant to a petition or complaint filed by the public utility, personal notice of which has been served on the owners of the property to be condemned, and an adjudication hearing in accordance with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1701), including an opportunity for the public to participate.

(B) The requirements of this section do not apply to the condemnation of any property that is necessary solely for an electrical company or gas corporation to meet its commission-ordered obligation to serve. Proposed exercises of eminent domain by electrical or gas corporations that initially, or subsequently, acquire property for either commission-ordered electrical corporation obligation to serve and competitive telecommunications services or gas corporation obligation to serve and telecommunications services are subject to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). For property acquired through the exercise of eminent domain after January 1, 2000, by an electrical or gas corporation solely to meet its commission-ordered obligation to serve, any electrical or gas corporation, or subsidiary or affiliate, that intends to install telecommunication equipment on the property for the purpose of providing competitive telecommunications services shall provide notice for the planned installation in the commission calendar.

(2) (A) Before making a finding pursuant to this subdivision, the commission shall conduct the hearing in the local jurisdiction that would be affected by the proposed condemnation. The hearing shall commence within 45 days of the date that the petition or complaint is filed, unless the respondent establishes that an extension of not more than 30 days is necessary for discovery or other hearing preparation. The commission shall provide public notice of the hearing pursuant to the procedures of the commission and shall also notify the local jurisdiction. In addition, the commission shall provide the local jurisdiction with copies of the notice of hearing in time for the local jurisdiction to mail that notice at least seven days in advance of the hearing to all persons who have requested copies of the local jurisdiction’s agenda or agenda packet pursuant to Section 54954.1 of the Government Code.

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), “local jurisdiction” means each city within whose boundaries property sought to be taken by eminent domain is located, and if property sought to be taken is not located within city boundaries, each county within whose boundaries that property is located. However, where there is more than one local jurisdiction with respect to a single complaint or petition, the commission shall provide notice and copies of notices for mailing to all local jurisdictions involved, but shall hold only a single hearing in any one of those local jurisdictions.

(3) (A) The assigned commissioner or administrative law judge shall render a decision on making a finding in accordance with this subdivision within 45 days of the conclusion of the hearing, unless further briefing is ordered, in which event this period may be extended by up to 30 additional days to allow for briefing.

(B) If the rendering of a decision pursuant to this subdivision requires review under the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code), then the time limits contained in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) shall be extended as needed to accommodate that review.

(4) This subdivision and Section 626 do not apply to a railroad corporation, a refined petroleum product common carrier pipeline corporation, or a water corporation.

(b) The commission may make a finding pursuant to subdivision (a) if, in the determination of the commission, either of the following conditions is met:

(1) The proposed condemnation is necessary to provide service as a provider of last resort to an unserved area, except when there are competing offers from facility-based carriers to serve that area.

(2) The public utility is able to show all of the following with regard to the proposed condemnation:

(A) The public interest and necessity require the proposed project.

(B) The property to be condemned is necessary for the proposed project.

(C) The public benefit of acquiring the property by eminent domain outweighs the hardship to the owners of the property.

(D) The proposed project is located in a manner most compatible with the greatest public good and least private injury.

(c) The commission shall develop procedures to facilitate access for affected property owners to eminent domain proceedings pursuant to this section, and to facilitate the participation of those owners in those proceedings.

(d) Nothing in this section relieves a public utility from complying with Section 1240.030 of the Code of Civil Procedure or any other requirement imposed by law.

(e) A public utility that does not comply with this section may not exercise the power of eminent domain, including, but not limited to, any authority provided by Title 7 (commencing with Section 1230.010) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(f) The authority provided in this section supplements, and does not replace or otherwise affect any other limitation in law on the exercise of the power of eminent domain, including, but not limited to, any authority provided by Title 7 (commencing with Section 1230.010) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(g) (1) At the request of a public utility gas corporation, the commission shall hold the local hearing required in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and make and certify the finding required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) as part of the procedure to issue a certificate of public convenience and necessity.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the commission holds public hearings during the certification procedure for the purpose of making the determination required under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the commission shall have an additional 45 days beyond the date of any otherwise applicable statutory or regulatory deadline for making a determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 14, Sec. 1.   Effective August 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

626.

On or after January 1, 2000, a public utility may not enter into any exclusive access agreement with the owner or lessor of, or a person controlling or managing, a property or premises served by the public utility, or commit or permit any other act, that would limit the right of any other public utility to provide service to a tenant or other occupant of the property or premises.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 774, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Consultant and Advisory Services [631. - 633.]

631.

In addition to the requirements of Article 1 (commencing with Section 1001) of Chapter 5 and any other provisions of law, the commission shall require every electrical corporation and every gas corporation proposing to construct or modify any electric plant or gas plant at a cost in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) to reimburse the commission for expenses of such consultants or advisory services as the commission deems necessary for either or both of the following:

(a) The processing of an application for certification of the plant.

(b) The processing of an application for approval of any rate increase reflecting the inclusion of the cost of the plant in the rates of the corporation. This subdivision applies to any plant for which the costs of construction or modification are approved for inclusion in the corporation’s rates on or after January 1, 1983.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1139, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

632.

For purposes of entering into contracts for consultant or advisory services, the requirements of Sections 11042 and 14615 of the Government Code and Sections 10295 and 10318 of the Public Contract Code apply to the activities of the commission, except when the commission makes a finding that extraordinary circumstances justify expedited contracting for consultant or advisory services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1035, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

633.

The requirements of Section 632 do not apply to contracts for legal services. The commission shall notify the Attorney General when contracting for legal services by attorneys who are not employees of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 421, Sec. 19.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Long-Term Plans and Procurement Plans [635. - 635.]

635.

In a long-term plan adopted by an electrical corporation or in a procurement plan implemented by a local publicly owned electric utility, the electrical corporation or local publicly owned electric utility shall adopt a strategy applicable both to newly constructed and repowered generation owned and procured by the electrical corporation or local publicly owned electric utility to achieve efficiency in the use of fossil fuels and to address emissions of greenhouse gases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 818, Sec. 1.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Biomethane Procurement [650. - 651.]

650.

For purposes of this article, “biomethane” means methane produced from an organic waste feedstock that meets the standards adopted pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 25421 of the Health and Safety Code for injection into a common carrier pipeline and that meets either of the following requirements:

(a) The methane is produced from the anaerobic decomposition of organic material, including codigestion.

(b) The methane is produced from the noncombustion thermal conversion of any of the following materials, when separated from other waste:

(1) Agricultural crop residues.

(2) Bark, lawn, yard, and garden clippings.

(3) Leaves, silvicultural residue, and tree and brush
 prunings.

(4) Wood, wood chips, and wood waste.

(5) Nonrecyclable pulp or nonrecyclable paper materials.

(6) Livestock waste.

(7) Municipal sewage sludge or biosolids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 358, Sec. 1.   (AB 3163)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

651.

(a) The commission, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board, shall consider adopting specific biomethane procurement targets or goals for each gas corporation and core transport agent, as defined in Section 980, so that each gas corporation and core transport agent procures a proportionate share, as determined by the commission, of biomethane annually. Before establishing biomethane procurement targets or goals, the commission shall make both of the following findings:

(1) The targets or goals are cost-effective means of achieving the forecast reduction in the emissions of short-lived climate pollutants pursuant to Section 39730.5 of the Health and Safety Code and other
 greenhouse gases pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) The targets or goals comply with all applicable state and federal laws.

(b) If the commission adopts specific biomethane procurement targets or goals for each gas corporation and core transport agent pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Consider the recommendations developed pursuant to Section 39730.8 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Ensure the targets or goals are consistent with the organic waste disposal reduction targets specified in Section 39730.6
 of the Health and Safety Code and the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42652.5 of the Public Resources Code to achieve those targets.

(3) Ensure that biomethane eligible for any procurement program meets one of the following conditions:

(A) The biomethane is delivered to California through a dedicated pipeline.

(B) The biomethane is delivered to California through a common carrier pipeline and meets both of the following requirements:

(i) The source of biomethane injects the biomethane into a common carrier pipeline that physically flows within California, or toward the end user in California for which the biomethane was produced.

(ii) The seller or purchaser of the biomethane demonstrates that the capture or production of biomethane directly results in at least one of the following environmental benefits to California:

(I) The reduction or avoidance of the emission of any criteria air pollutant, toxic air contaminant, or greenhouse gas in California.

(II) The reduction or avoidance of pollutants that could have an adverse impact on waters of the state.

(III) The alleviation of a local nuisance within California that is associated with the emission of odors.

(4) Authorize a core transport agent to
 enter into an agreement with a gas corporation for the gas corporation to procure the core transport agent’s proportionate share of biomethane in order to satisfy the specific biomethane procurement targets or goals adopted by the commission, with all costs paid for by the core transport agent and any environmental attributes allocated by the commission in a fair and transparent manner.

(c) The commission shall initially allocate each core transport agent their proportional share of the existing biomethane procurement targets established by commission Decision 22-02-025 (February 24, 2022) Decision Implementing Senate Bill 1440 Biomethane Procurement Program. This
 subdivision shall not prohibit the commission from establishing additional biomethane targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 339, Sec. 1.   (AB 678)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Neighborhood Decarbonization Zone Pilot Projects [660. - 666.]

660.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Disadvantaged community” means a community identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) “Distribution integrity management plan” means a plan developed pursuant to Part 192 (commencing with Section 192.1) of Subchapter D of Chapter I of Subtitle B of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) “Gas distribution line” means either a gas distribution main line or gas distribution service line.

(d) “Gas
 distribution main line” has the same meaning as “main” set forth in Section 192.3 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(e) “Gas distribution service line” has the same meaning as “service line” set forth in Section 192.3 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(f) “Low-income” means having a household income no greater than 80 percent of area median income or qualifying for participation in the California Alternate Rates for Energy (CARE) program or Family Electric Rate Assistance (FERA) program.

(g) “Priority neighborhood decarbonization zone” means a zone identified pursuant to Section 662.

(h) “Thermal energy network” means a network of
 piped noncombustible fluids used for transferring heat into and out of buildings for purposes of providing zero-emission heating and cooling services.

(i) “Tribe” means a California Native American tribe, as defined in Section 21073 of the Public Resources Code.

(j) “Zero-emission alternatives” means methods of providing gas customers with suitable substitute energy service that does not require new investment in gas distribution lines, including, but not limited to, electrification of gas end uses and energy efficiency, thermal energy networks, and demand flexibility measures to alter energy needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 602, Sec. 3.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 666.)
-------------------------------------------

661.

(a) On or before July 1, 2025, and each year thereafter, each gas corporation shall submit to the commission a map that includes all of the following:

(1) The location of all potential gas distribution line replacement projects identified in its distribution integrity management plan and any foreseeable gas distribution pipeline
 replacements.

(2) The city, county, and census tract boundaries within the gas corporation’s service territory.

(3) Locations of disadvantaged communities, tribes, and priority neighborhood decarbonization zones, as designated by the commission pursuant to Section 662, that are within
 the gas corporation’s service territory.

(4) Any additional information required by the commission.

(b) This section does not modify a gas corporation’s safety requirements under state or federal law.

(c) On or after January 1, 2030, the commission may determine whether gas corporations will continue to be subject to the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 602, Sec. 3.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 666.)
-------------------------------------------

662.

(a) On or before January 1, 2026, in a new or existing proceeding and following recommendations from each gas corporation and the opportunity for public comment, the commission shall designate priority neighborhood decarbonization zones. In designating the zones, the commission shall consider factors that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Presence of disadvantaged or low-income communities in high-temperature climate zones or low-temperature climate zones that
 disproportionately lack cooling or heating.

(2) Presence of environmental and social justice communities as defined in the commission’s Environmental and Social Justice Action Plan.

(3) Availability of supportive local government or community partners.

(4) Concentration of gas distribution line replacement projects identified in the map submitted pursuant to Section 661.

(b) The commission shall coordinate with relevant agencies to identify nonratepayer funding, such as state and federal funds, that may be used to execute pilot projects in priority neighborhood decarbonization zones that would be cost effective with supplemental nonratepayer funding.

(c) If pilot projects for zero-emission alternatives pursuant to Section 663 are implemented in a priority neighborhood decarbonization zone, the commission may direct gas corporations and electrical corporations, if appropriate, to leverage other available programs, including, but not limited to, energy efficiency, low-income weatherization, and distributed generation programs.

(d) The commission may, after providing an opportunity for public comment, update the priority neighborhood decarbonization zones as necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 602, Sec. 3.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 666.)
-------------------------------------------

663.

(a) On or before July 1, 2026, in a new or existing proceeding, the commission, in consultation with the state’s gas corporations, shall establish a voluntary program to facilitate the cost-effective decarbonization of priority neighborhood decarbonization zones, not to exceed 30 pilot projects across the state and affecting no more than 1 percent of each gas corporation’s customers within their service territory. A pilot project where a gas corporation obtains the consent of 100 percent of property owners with natural gas service within the pilot project boundary shall not count toward the 30 pilot project limit.

(b) In administering the pilot projects established
 pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall establish all of the following:

(1) A process for gas corporations to determine and submit pilot projects for approval.

(2) Criteria and methodology for determining the cost-effectiveness of a zero-emission alternative as compared to replacement, repair, or continued operation of the affected asset of the gas system. Nonenergy benefits may be considered in prioritizing pilot projects, but shall not be used to calculate cost-effectiveness. The total cost incurred by the gas corporation for the zero-emission alternative shall be less than the total cost that would have otherwise occurred. Gas corporations shall use nonratepayer funding when available.

(3) Requirements
 and programs to ensure that a substitute for gas service for low-income customers is affordable, adequate, efficient, and just and reasonable.

(4) A requirement that no less than 67 percent of the property owners with natural gas service within the pilot project boundary consent to the pilot project. The commission shall establish the manner in which consent shall be received and notifications about the pilot project shall be provided to property owners and affected customers. Notifications shall include information about the anticipated costs and benefits of the zero-emission alternative offering. Notifications shall be made available in the zone’s prevailing languages.

(5) A requirement for addressing master-metered properties to ensure tenants receive adequate notification and
 engagement.

(6) A preference for pilot projects that provide prevailing wages and use high road job programs.

(7) A requirement that gas corporations and electrical corporations, local publicly owned electric utilities, load-serving entities, local governments, and, if feasible, core transport agents affected by the pilot project coordinate and collaborate.

(8) A requirement that gas corporations recover costs related to the pilot projects that are deemed just and reasonable and a requirement that prohibits a gas corporation from recovering behind-the-meter costs associated with the pilot projects as capital costs that are afforded a rate of return.

(9) The
 appropriate rate of return and recovery period that a gas corporation is eligible to receive for its costs to implement a zero-emission alternative. A gas corporation shall not receive ratepayer funding for the costs of a zero-emission alternative that are covered by incentives under federal, state, or local laws.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, if the commission approves a pilot project proposed by a gas corporation pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission
 shall, pursuant to Section 451.9, relieve the gas corporation of its obligation to provide service within the pilot project boundary upon completion of all affected customers’ conversion to zero-emission alternatives. A property owner’s withholding of consent to a pilot project shall not give rise to a right to continued natural gas service if the commission approves a pilot project that includes that property within its boundary.

(d) The commission shall not establish pilot projects under this section on or after January 1, 2030.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 602, Sec. 3.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 666.)
-------------------------------------------

664.

(a) (1) Beginning on January 1, 2029, the commission, in a new or existing proceeding, shall review the efficacy of the pilot projects established pursuant to Section 663 in providing benefits to gas corporation customers and in assisting the state in meeting the state’s climate change goals.

(2) On or before March 1, 2030, the commission shall submit to the relevant policy committees of the Legislature a report on the review performed pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) On or before March 1, 2026, and on or before March 1 of each year thereafter, the commission shall submit a progress report to
 the relevant policy committees of the Legislature summarizing the findings of the pilot projects, including the locations of the pilot projects, the number of customers affected, the costs of the pilot projects, the funding used to pay for the pilot projects, any assistance provided to customers, and any outcomes, challenges, and recommendations.

(c) Reports submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 602, Sec. 3.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 666.)
-------------------------------------------

665.

In a new or existing proceeding, the commission shall evaluate the costs and benefits of thermal energy networks and identify potential implementation barriers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 602, Sec. 3.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 666.)
-------------------------------------------

666.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) or (c), this article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a pilot project that has been established pursuant to Section 663 and is pending as of January 1, 2031, may continue until the completion of the pilot project.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not affect the commission’s authorization to relieve a gas corporation of its obligation to provide service within a pilot project boundary under subdivision (c) of Section 663.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 602, Sec. 3.   (SB 1221)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   Repeal affects Article 11, commencing with Section 660.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Regulation of Public Utilities [701. - 940.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [701. - 719.]

701.

The commission may supervise and regulate every public utility in the State and may do all things, whether specifically designated in this part or in addition thereto, which are necessary and convenient in the exercise of such power and jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

701.1.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that, in addition to other ratepayer protection objectives, a principal goal of electric and natural gas utilities’ resource planning and investment shall be to minimize the cost to society of the reliable energy services that are provided by natural gas and electricity, and to improve the environment and to encourage the diversity of energy sources through improvements in energy efficiency, the development of renewable energy resources, such as wind, solar, biomass, and geothermal energy, and widespread transportation electrification.

(2) The amendment made to this subdivision by the Clean Energy and Pollution Reduction Act of 2015 (Chapter 547 of the Statutes of 2015) does not expand the authority of
 the commission beyond that provided by other law.
